District of Columbia statutes.
29-1001.08

Relation to restraint of trade and antitrust laws.

To the extent a limited cooperative association or activities conducted by the association in the District meet the material requirements for other cooperatives entitled to an exemption from or immunity under § 29-937, the association and its activities shall be entitled to the exemption or immunity. This section shall not create any new exemption or immunity for an association or affect any exemption or immunity provided to a cooperative organized under any other law.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 110 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.